Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4608
Exception to presumption of unlimited authority.

Unless the terms of the instrument creating a power of appointment manifest a contrary intent, the power is nongeneral if:

(1) the power is exercisable only at the powerholder's death; and

(2) the permissible appointees of the power are a defined and limited class that does not include the powerholder's estate, the powerholder's creditors, or the creditors of the powerholder's estate.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 31.